Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-131
Common or contract carriers; jurisdictional utility; complaint of violation; service; other proceedings.

Any person who complains of anything done or omitted to be done by any common or contract carrier or jurisdictional utility may request that the commission investigate and impose sanctions on such carrier or jurisdictional utility by filing a petition which briefly states the facts constituting the complaint. Notice of the complaint shall be served upon the respondent carrier or utility as in civil cases in district court, and the respondent shall be required to answer or satisfy the complaint within a reasonable time fixed by the commission. This section shall not prevent any person from proceeding against any common or contract carrier or utility under the laws of this state for such cases made and provided.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 31, p. 1366;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 44;

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 70.